Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.405

Microchip in a horse—Removal with intent to defraud—Gross misdemeanor.

A person who removes or causes to be removed a microchip implanted in a horse, or who removes or causes to be removed a microchip from one horse and implants or causes it to be implanted in another horse, with the intent to defraud a subsequent purchaser, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1996 c 105 s 2.]